Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1396.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 1356, as


last amended by Section 1, Chapter 392, O.S.L. 2025 (68 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 1356), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1356. Exemptions - Governmental and nonprofit entities.


There are hereby specifically exempted from the tax levied by


Section 1350 et seq. of this title:


1. Sale of tangible personal property or services to the United


States government or to this state, any political subdivision of


this state, or any agency of a political subdivision of this state;

Req. No. 3482 Page 1


provided, all sales to contractors in connection with the


performance of any contract with the United States government, this


state, or any of its political subdivisions shall not be exempted


from the tax levied by Section 1350 et seq. of this title, except as


hereinafter provided;


2. Sales of property to agents appointed by or under contract


with agencies or instrumentalities of the United States government


if ownership and possession of such property transfers immediately


to the United States government;


3. Sales of property to agents appointed by or under contract


with a political subdivision of this state if the sale of such


property is associated with the development of a qualified federal


facility, as provided in the Oklahoma Federal Facilities Development


Act, and if ownership and possession of such property transfers


immediately to the political subdivision or the state;


4. Sales made directly by county, district, or state fair


authorities of this state, upon the premises of the fair authority,


for the sole benefit of the fair authority or sales of admission


tickets to such fairs or fair events at any location in the state


authorized by county, district, or state fair authorities; provided,


the exemption provided by this paragraph for admission tickets to


fair events shall apply only to any portion of the admission price


that is retained by or distributed to the fair authority. As used


in this paragraph, “fair event” shall be limited to an event held on

Req. No. 3482 Page 2


the premises of the fair authority in conjunction with and during


the time period of a county, district, or state fair;


5. Sale of food in cafeterias or lunchrooms of elementary


schools, high schools, colleges, or universities which are operated


primarily for teachers and pupils and are not operated primarily for


the public or for profit;


6. Dues paid to fraternal, religious, civic, charitable, or


educational societies or organizations by regular members thereof,


provided, such societies or organizations operate under what is


commonly termed the lodge plan or system, and provided such


societies or organizations do not operate for a profit which inures


to the benefit of any individual member or members thereof to the


exclusion of other members and dues paid monthly or annually to


privately owned scientific and educational libraries by members


sharing the use of services rendered by such libraries with students


interested in the study of geology, petroleum engineering, or


related subjects;


7. Sale of tangible personal property or services to or by


churches, except sales made in the course of business for profit or


savings, competing with other persons engaged in the same, or a


similar business or sale of tangible personal property or services


by an organization exempt from federal income tax pursuant to


Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,


made on behalf of or at the request of a church or churches if the

Req. No. 3482 Page 3


sale of such property is conducted not more than once each calendar


year for a period not to exceed three (3) days by the organization


and proceeds from the sale of such property are used by the church


or churches or by the organization for charitable purposes;


8. The amount of proceeds received from the sale of admission


tickets which is separately stated on the ticket of admission for


the repayment of money borrowed by any accredited state-supported


college or university or any public trust of which a county in this


state is the beneficiary, for the purpose of constructing or


enlarging any facility to be used for the staging of an athletic


event, a theatrical production, or any other form of entertainment,


edification or cultural cultivation to which entry is gained with a


paid admission ticket. Such facilities include, but are not limited


to, athletic fields, athletic stadiums, field houses, amphitheaters,


and theaters. To be eligible for this sales tax exemption, the


amount separately stated on the admission ticket shall be a


surcharge which is imposed, collected, and used for the sole purpose


of servicing or aiding in the servicing of debt incurred by the


college or university to effect the capital improvements


hereinbefore described;


9. Sales of tangible personal property or services to the


council organizations or similar state supervisory organizations of


the Boy Scouts of America Scouting America, Girl Scouts of the


U.S.A., and Camp Fire;

Req. No. 3482 Page 4


10. Sale of tangible personal property or services to any


county, municipality, rural water district, public school district,


city-county library system, the institutions of The Oklahoma State


System of Higher Education, the Grand River Dam Authority, the


Northeast Oklahoma Public Facilities Authority, the Oklahoma


Municipal Power Authority, City of Tulsa-Rogers County Port


Authority, Muskogee City-County Port Authority, the Oklahoma


Department of Veterans Affairs, the Broken Bow Economic Development


Authority, Ardmore Development Authority, Durant Industrial


Authority, Oklahoma Ordnance Works Authority, Central Oklahoma


Master Conservancy District, Arbuckle Master Conservancy District,


Fort Cobb Reservoir Master Conservancy District, Foss Reservoir


Master Conservancy District, Mountain Park Master Conservancy


District, Waurika Lake Master Conservancy District and the Office of


Management and Enterprise Services only when carrying out a public


construction contract on behalf of the Oklahoma Department of


Veterans Affairs, and effective July 1, 2022, the University


Hospitals Trust, or to any person with whom any of the above-named


subdivisions or agencies of this state has duly entered into a


public contract pursuant to law, necessary for carrying out such


public contract or to any subcontractor to such a public contract.


Any person making purchases on behalf of such subdivision or agency


of this state shall certify, in writing, on the copy of the invoice


or sales ticket to be retained by the vendor that the purchases are

Req. No. 3482 Page 5


made for and on behalf of such subdivision or agency of this state


and set out the name of such public subdivision or agency. Any


person who wrongfully or erroneously certifies that purchases are


for any of the above-named subdivisions or agencies of this state or


who otherwise violates this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor


and upon conviction thereof shall be fined an amount equal to double


the amount of sales tax involved or incarcerated for not more than


sixty (60) days or both;


11. Sales of tangible personal property or services to private


institutions of higher education and private elementary and


secondary institutions of education accredited by the State


Department of Education or registered by the State Board of


Education for purposes of participating in federal programs or


accredited as defined by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher


Education which are exempt from taxation pursuant to the provisions


of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section


501(c)(3) including materials, supplies, and equipment used in the


construction and improvement of buildings and other structures owned


by the institutions and operated for educational purposes.


Any person, firm, agency, or entity making purchases on behalf


of any institution, agency or subdivision in this state, shall


certify in writing, on the copy of the invoice or sales ticket the


nature of the purchases, and violation of this paragraph shall be a


misdemeanor as set forth in paragraph 10 of this section;

Req. No. 3482 Page 6


12. Tuition and educational fees paid to private institutions


of higher education and private elementary and secondary


institutions of education accredited by the State Department of


Education or registered by the State Board of Education for purposes


of participating in federal programs or accredited as defined by the


Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education which are exempt from


taxation pursuant to the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3);


13. a. Sales of tangible personal property made by:


(1) a public school,


(2) a private school offering instruction for grade


levels kindergarten through twelfth grade,


(3) a public school district,


(4) a public or private school board,


(5) a public or private school student group or


organization,


(6) a parent-teacher association or organization


other than as specified in subparagraph b of this


paragraph, or


(7) public or private school personnel for purposes


of raising funds for the benefit of a public or


private school, public school district, public or


private school board, or public or private school


student group or organization, or

Req. No. 3482 Page 7


b. Sales of tangible personal property made by or to


nonprofit parent-teacher associations or organizations


exempt from taxation pursuant to the provisions of the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C.,


Section 501(c)(3), nonprofit local public or private


school foundations which solicit money or property in


the name of any public or private school or public


school district.


The exemption provided by this paragraph for sales made by a


public or private school shall be limited to those public or private


schools accredited by the State Department of Education or


registered by the State Board of Education for purposes of


participating in federal programs. Sale of tangible personal


property in this paragraph shall include sale of admission tickets


and concessions at athletic events;


14. Sales of tangible personal property by:


a. local 4-H clubs,


b. county, regional or state 4-H councils,


c. county, regional or state 4-H committees,


d. 4-H leader associations,


e. county, regional or state 4-H foundations, and


f. authorized 4-H camps and training centers.


The exemption provided by this paragraph shall be limited to


sales for the purpose of raising funds for the benefit of such

Req. No. 3482 Page 8


organizations. Sale of tangible personal property exempted by this


paragraph shall include sale of admission tickets;


15. The first Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00) each


year from sale of tickets and concessions at athletic events by each


organization exempt from taxation pursuant to the provisions of the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section


501(c)(4);


16. Sales of tangible personal property or services to any


person with whom the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department has


entered into a public contract and which is necessary for carrying


out such contract to assist the Department in the development and


production of advertising, promotion, publicity, and public


relations programs;


17. Sales of tangible personal property or services to fire


departments organized pursuant to Section 592 of Title 18 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, which items are to be used for the purposes of


the fire department. Any person making purchases on behalf of any


such fire department shall certify, in writing, on the copy of the


invoice or sales ticket to be retained by the vendor that the


purchases are made for and on behalf of such fire department and set


out the name of such fire department. Any person who wrongfully or


erroneously certifies that the purchases are for any such fire


department or who otherwise violates the provisions of this section


shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof,

Req. No. 3482 Page 9


shall be fined an amount equal to double the amount of sales tax


involved or incarcerated for not more than sixty (60) days, or both;


18. Complimentary or free tickets for admission to places of


amusement, sports, entertainment, exhibition, display, or other


recreational events or activities which are issued through a box


office or other entity which is operated by a state institution of


higher education with institutional employees or by a municipality


with municipal employees;


19. The first Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) each year


from sales of tangible personal property by fire departments


organized pursuant to Title 11, 18, or 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes


for the purposes of raising funds for the benefit of the fire


department. Fire departments selling tangible personal property for


the purposes of raising funds shall be limited to no more than six


(6) days each year to raise such funds in order to receive the


exemption granted by this paragraph;


20. Sales of tangible personal property or services to any Boys


& Girls Clubs of America affiliate in this state which is not


affiliated with the Salvation Army and which is exempt from taxation


pursuant to the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as


amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3);


21. Sales of tangible personal property or services to any


organization, which takes court-adjudicated juveniles for purposes


of rehabilitation, and which is exempt from taxation pursuant to the

Req. No. 3482 Page 10


provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26


U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3), provided that at least fifty percent


(50%) of the juveniles served by such organization are court


adjudicated and the organization receives state funds in an amount


less than ten percent (10%) of the annual budget of the


organization;


22. Sales of tangible personal property or services to:


a. any health center as defined in Section 254b of Title


of the United States Code,


b. any clinic receiving disbursements of state monies


from the Indigent Health Care Revolving Fund pursuant


to the provisions of Section 66 of Title 56 of the


Oklahoma Statutes,


c. any community-based health center which meets all of


the following criteria:


(1) provides primary care services at no cost to the


recipient, and


(2) is exempt from taxation pursuant to the


provisions of Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal


Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C.,


Section 501(c)(3), and


d. any community mental health center as defined in


Section 3-302 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 3482 Page 11


23. Dues or fees including free or complimentary dues or fees


which have a value equivalent to the charge that could have


otherwise been made, to YMCAs, YWCAs, or municipally-owned


recreation centers for the use of facilities and programs;


24. The first Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) each year


from sales of tangible personal property or services to or by a


cultural organization established to sponsor and promote


educational, charitable, and cultural events for disadvantaged


children, and which organization is exempt from taxation pursuant to


the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26


U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3);


25. Sales of tangible personal property or services to museums


or other entities which have been accredited by the American


Alliance of Museums. Any person making purchases on behalf of any


such museum or other entity shall certify, in writing, on the copy


of the invoice or sales ticket to be retained by the vendor that the


purchases are made for and on behalf of such museum or other entity


and set out the name of such museum or other entity. Any person who


wrongfully or erroneously certifies that the purchases are for any


such museum or other entity or who otherwise violates the provisions


of this paragraph shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon


conviction thereof, shall be fined an amount equal to double the


amount of sales tax involved or incarcerated for not more than sixty


(60) days, or by both such fine and incarceration;

Req. No. 3482 Page 12


26. Sales of tickets for admission by any museum accredited by


the American Alliance of Museums. In order to be eligible for the


exemption provided by this paragraph, an amount equivalent to the


amount of the tax which would otherwise be required to be collected


pursuant to the provisions of Section 1350 et seq. of this title


shall be separately stated on the admission ticket and shall be


collected and used for the sole purpose of servicing or aiding in


the servicing of debt incurred by the museum to effect the


construction, enlarging or renovation of any facility to be used for


entertainment, edification, or cultural cultivation to which entry


is gained with a paid admission ticket;


27. Sales of tangible personal property or services occurring


on or after June 1, 1995, to children’s homes which are supported or


sponsored by one or more churches, members of which serve as


trustees of the home;


28. Sales of tangible personal property or services to the


organization known as the Disabled American Veterans, Department of


Oklahoma, Inc., and subordinate chapters thereof;


29. Sales of tangible personal property or services to youth


camps which are supported or sponsored by one or more churches,


members of which serve as trustees of the organization;


30. a. Until July 1, 2022, transfer of tangible personal


property made pursuant to Section 3226 of Title 63 of



Req. No. 3482 Page 13


the Oklahoma Statutes by the University Hospitals


Trust, and


b. Effective July 1, 2022, transfer of tangible personal


property or services to or by:


(1) the University Hospitals Trust created pursuant


to Section 3224 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, or


(2) nonprofit entities which are exempt from taxation


pursuant to the provisions of the Internal


Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, of the United


States, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3), which have


entered into a joint operating agreement with the


University Hospitals Trust;


31. Sales of tangible personal property or services to a


municipality, county, or school district pursuant to a lease or


lease-purchase agreement executed between the vendor and a


municipality, county, or school district. A copy of the lease or


lease-purchase agreement shall be retained by the vendor;


32. Sales of tangible personal property or services to any


spaceport user, as defined in the Oklahoma Space Industry


Development Act;


33. The sale, use, storage, consumption, or distribution in


this state, whether by the importer, exporter, or another person, of


any satellite or any associated launch vehicle including components

Req. No. 3482 Page 14


of, and parts and motors for, any such satellite or launch vehicle,


imported or caused to be imported into this state for the purpose of


export by means of launching into space. This exemption provided by


this paragraph shall not be affected by:


a. the destruction in whole or in part of the satellite


or launch vehicle,


b. the failure of a launch to occur or be successful, or


c. the absence of any transfer or title to, or possession


of, the satellite or launch vehicle after launch;


34. The sale, lease, use, storage, consumption, or distribution


in this state of any space facility, space propulsion system or


space vehicle, satellite, or station of any kind possessing space


flight capacity including components thereof;


35. The sale, lease, use, storage, consumption, or distribution


in this state of tangible personal property, placed on or used


aboard any space facility, space propulsion system or space vehicle,


satellite, or station possessing space flight capacity, which is


launched into space, irrespective of whether such tangible property


is returned to this state for subsequent use, storage, or


consumption in any manner;


36. The sale, lease, use, storage, consumption, or distribution


in this state of tangible personal property meeting the definition


of “section 38 property” as defined in Sections 48(a)(1)(A) and


(B)(i) 26 C.F.R., Section 1.48-1 of the Internal Revenue Code of

Req. No. 3482 Page 15


1986, as amended, that is an integral part of and used primarily in


support of space flight; however, section 38 property used in


support of space flight shall not include general office equipment,


any boat, mobile home, motor vehicle, or other vehicle of a class or


type required to be registered, licensed, titled or documented in


this state or by the United States government, or any other property


not specifically suited to supporting space activity. The term “in


support of space flight”, for purposes of this paragraph, means the


altering, monitoring, controlling, regulating, adjusting, servicing,


or repairing of any space facility, space propulsion systems or


space vehicle, satellite, or station possessing space flight


capacity including the components thereof;


37. The purchase or lease of machinery and equipment for use at


a fixed location in this state, which is used exclusively in the


manufacturing, processing, compounding, or producing of any space


facility, space propulsion system or space vehicle, satellite, or


station of any kind possessing space flight capacity. Provided, the


exemption provided for in this paragraph shall not be allowed unless


the purchaser or lessee signs an affidavit stating that the item or


items to be exempted are for the exclusive use designated herein.


Any person furnishing a false affidavit to the vendor for the


purpose of evading payment of any tax imposed by Section 1354 of


this title shall be subject to the penalties provided by law. As


used in this paragraph, “machinery and equipment” means “section 38

Req. No. 3482 Page 16


property” as defined in Sections 48(a)(1)(A) and (B)(i) 26 C.F.R.,


Section 1.48-1 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,


which is used as an integral part of the manufacturing, processing,


compounding, or producing of items of tangible personal property.


Such term includes parts and accessories only to the extent that the


exemption thereof is consistent with the provisions of this


paragraph;


38. The amount of a surcharge or any other amount which is


separately stated on an admission ticket which is imposed, collected


and used for the sole purpose of constructing, remodeling, or


enlarging facilities of a public trust having a municipality or


county as its sole beneficiary;


39. Sales of tangible personal property or services which are


directly used in or for the benefit of a state park in this state,


which are made to an organization which is exempt from taxation


pursuant to the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as


amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3) and which is organized


primarily for the purpose of supporting one or more state parks


located in this state;


40. The sale, lease, or use of parking privileges by an


institution of The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education;


41. Sales of tangible personal property or services for use on


campus or school construction projects for the benefit of


institutions of The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education,

Req. No. 3482 Page 17


private institutions of higher education accredited by the Oklahoma


State Regents for Higher Education, or any public school or school


district when such projects are financed by or through the use of


nonprofit entities which are exempt from taxation pursuant to the


provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26


U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3);


42. Sales of tangible personal property or services by an


organization which is exempt from taxation pursuant to the


provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26


U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3), in the course of conducting a national


championship sports event, but only if all or a portion of the


payment in exchange therefor would qualify as the receipt of a


qualified sponsorship payment described in Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 513(i). Sales exempted


pursuant to this paragraph shall be exempt from all Oklahoma sales,


use, excise, and gross receipts taxes;


43. Sales of tangible personal property or services to or by an


organization which:


a. is exempt from taxation pursuant to the provisions of


the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26


U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3),


b. is affiliated with a comprehensive university within


The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education, and



Req. No. 3482 Page 18


c. has been organized primarily for the purpose of


providing education and teacher training and


conducting events relating to robotics;


44. The first Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) each year


from sales of tangible personal property to or by youth athletic


teams which are part of an athletic organization exempt from


taxation pursuant to the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(4), for the purposes of


raising funds for the benefit of the team;


45. Sales of tickets for admission to a collegiate athletic


event that is held in a facility owned or operated by a municipality


or a public trust of which the municipality is the sole beneficiary


and that actually determines or is part of a tournament or


tournament process for determining a conference tournament


championship, a conference championship, or a national championship;


46. Sales of tangible personal property or services to or by an


organization which is exempt from taxation pursuant to the


provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26


U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3) and is operating the Oklahoma City


National Memorial and Museum, an affiliate of the National Park


System;


47. Sales of tangible personal property or services to


organizations which are exempt from federal taxation pursuant to the


provisions of Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of

Req. No. 3482 Page 19


1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3), the memberships of


which are limited to honorably discharged veterans, and which


furnish financial support to area veterans’ organizations to be used


for the purpose of constructing a memorial or museum;


48. Sales of tangible personal property or services on or after


January 1, 2003, to an organization which is exempt from taxation


pursuant to the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as


amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3) that is expending monies


received from a private foundation grant in conjunction with


expenditures of local sales tax revenue to construct a local public


library;


49. Sales of tangible personal property or services to a state


that borders this state or any political subdivision of that state,


but only to the extent that the other state or political subdivision


exempts or does not impose a tax on similar sales of items to this


state or a political subdivision of this state;


50. Effective July 1, 2005, sales of tangible personal property


or services to the career technology student organizations under the


direction and supervision of the Oklahoma Department of Career and


Technology Education;


51. Sales of tangible personal property to a public trust


having either a single city, town or county or multiple cities,


towns or counties, or combination thereof as beneficiary or


beneficiaries or a nonprofit organization which is exempt from

Req. No. 3482 Page 20


taxation pursuant to the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3) for the purpose of


constructing improvements to or expanding a hospital or nursing home


owned and operated by any such public trust or nonprofit entity


prior to July 1, 2008, in counties with a population of less than


one hundred thousand (100,000) persons, according to the most recent


Federal Decennial Census. As used in this paragraph, “constructing


improvements to or expanding” shall not mean any expense for routine


maintenance or general repairs and shall require a project cost of


at least One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00). For purposes


of this paragraph, sales made to a contractor or subcontractor that


enters into a contractual relationship with a public trust or


nonprofit entity as described by this paragraph shall be considered


sales made to the public trust or nonprofit entity. The exemption


authorized by this paragraph shall be administered in the form of a


refund from the sales tax revenues apportioned pursuant to Section


1353 of this title and the vendor shall be required to collect the


sales tax otherwise applicable to the transaction. The purchaser


may apply for a refund of the sales tax paid in the manner


prescribed by this paragraph. Within thirty (30) days after the end


of each fiscal year, any purchaser that is entitled to make


application for a refund based upon the exempt treatment authorized


by this paragraph may file an application for refund of the sales


taxes paid during such preceding fiscal year. The Oklahoma Tax

Req. No. 3482 Page 21


Commission shall prescribe a form for purposes of making the


application for refund. The Tax Commission shall determine whether


or not the total amount of sales tax exemptions claimed by all


purchasers is equal to or less than Six Hundred Fifty Thousand


Dollars ($650,000.00). If such claims are less than or equal to


that amount, the Tax Commission shall make refunds to the purchasers


in the full amount of the documented and verified sales tax amounts.


If such claims by all purchasers are in excess of Six Hundred Fifty


Thousand Dollars ($650,000.00), the Tax Commission shall determine


the amount of each purchaser’s claim, the total amount of all claims


by all purchasers, and the percentage each purchaser’s claim amount


bears to the total. The resulting percentage determined for each


purchaser shall be multiplied by Six Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars


($650,000.00) to determine the amount of refundable sales tax to be


paid to each purchaser. The pro rata refund amount shall be the


only method to recover sales taxes paid during the preceding fiscal


year and no balance of any sales taxes paid on a pro rata basis


shall be the subject of any subsequent refund claim pursuant to this


paragraph;


52. Effective July 1, 2006, sales of tangible personal property


or services to any organization which assists, trains, educates, and


provides housing for physically and mentally disabled persons and


which is exempt from taxation pursuant to the provisions of the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section

Req. No. 3482 Page 22


501(c)(3) and that receives at least eighty-five percent (85%) of


its annual budget from state or federal funds. In order to receive


the benefit of the exemption authorized by this paragraph, the


taxpayer shall be required to make payment of the applicable sales


tax at the time of sale to the vendor in the manner otherwise


required by law. Notwithstanding any other provision of the Uniform


Tax Procedure Code to the contrary, the taxpayer shall be authorized


to file a claim for refund of sales taxes paid that qualify for the


exemption authorized by this paragraph for a period of one (1) year


after the date of the sale transaction. The taxpayer shall be


required to provide documentation as may be prescribed by the


Oklahoma Tax Commission in support of the refund claim. The total


amount of sales tax qualifying for exempt treatment pursuant to this


paragraph shall not exceed One Hundred Seventy-five Thousand Dollars


($175,000.00) each fiscal year. Claims for refund shall be


processed in the order in which such claims are received by the


Oklahoma Tax Commission. If a claim otherwise timely filed exceeds


the total amount of refunds payable for a fiscal year, such claim


shall be barred;


53. The first Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) each year of


sales of tangible personal property or services to, by, or for the


benefit of a qualified neighborhood watch organization that is


endorsed or supported by or working directly with a law enforcement


agency with jurisdiction in the area in which the neighborhood watch

Req. No. 3482 Page 23


organization is located. As used in this paragraph, “qualified


neighborhood watch organization” means an organization that is a


not-for-profit corporation under the laws of this state that was


created to help prevent criminal activity in an area through


community involvement and interaction with local law enforcement and


which is one of the first two thousand organizations which makes


application to the Oklahoma Tax Commission for the exemption after


March 29, 2006;


54. Sales of tangible personal property to a nonprofit


organization, exempt from taxation pursuant to the provisions of the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section


501(c)(3), organized primarily for the purpose of providing services


to homeless persons during the day and located in a metropolitan


area with a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000)


persons according to the latest Federal Decennial Census. The


exemption authorized by this paragraph shall be applicable to sales


of tangible personal property to a qualified entity occurring on or


after January 1, 2005;


55. Sales of tangible personal property or services to or by an


organization which is exempt from taxation pursuant to the


provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26


U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3) for events the principal purpose of which


is to provide funding for the preservation of wetlands and habitat


for wild ducks;

Req. No. 3482 Page 24


56. Sales of tangible personal property or services to or by an


organization which is exempt from taxation pursuant to the


provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26


U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3) for events the principal purpose of which


is to provide funding for the preservation and conservation of wild


turkeys;


57. Sales of tangible personal property or services to an


organization which:


a. is exempt from taxation pursuant to the provisions of


the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26


U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3), and


b. is part of a network of community-based, autonomous


member organizations that meets the following


criteria:


(1) serves people with workplace disadvantages and


disabilities by providing job training and


employment services, as well as job placement


opportunities and post-employment support,


(2) has locations in the United States and at least


twenty other countries,


(3) collects donated clothing and household goods to


sell in retail stores and provides contract labor


services to business and government, and



Req. No. 3482 Page 25


(4) provides documentation to the Oklahoma Tax


Commission that over seventy-five percent (75%)


of its revenues are channeled into employment,


job training and placement programs, and other


critical community services;


58. Sales of tickets made on or after September 21, 2005, and


complimentary or free tickets for admission issued on or after


September 21, 2005, which have a value equivalent to the charge that


would have otherwise been made, for admission to a professional


athletic event in which a team in the National Basketball


Association is a participant, which is held in a facility owned or


operated by a municipality, a county, or a public trust of which a


municipality or a county is the sole beneficiary, and sales of


tickets made on or after July 1, 2007, and complimentary or free


tickets for admission issued on or after July 1, 2007, which have a


value equivalent to the charge that would have otherwise been made,


for admission to a professional athletic event in which a team in


the National Hockey League is a participant, which is held in a


facility owned or operated by a municipality, a county, or a public


trust of which a municipality or a county is the sole beneficiary;


59. Sales of tickets for admission and complimentary or free


tickets for admission which have a value equivalent to the charge


that would have otherwise been made to a professional sporting event


involving ice hockey, baseball, basketball, football or arena

Req. No. 3482 Page 26


football, or soccer. As used in this paragraph, “professional


sporting event” means an organized athletic competition between


teams that are members of an organized league or association with


centralized management, other than a national league or national


association, that imposes requirements for participation in the


league upon the teams, the individual athletes, or both, and which


uses a salary structure to compensate the athletes;


60. Sales of tickets for admission to an annual event sponsored


by an educational and charitable organization of women which is


exempt from taxation pursuant to the provisions of the Internal


Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3) and


has as its mission promoting volunteerism, developing the potential


of women and improving the community through the effective action


and leadership of trained volunteers;


61. Sales of tangible personal property or services to an


organization, which is exempt from taxation pursuant to the


provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26


U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3), and which is itself a member of an


organization which is exempt from taxation pursuant to the


provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26


U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3), if the membership organization is


primarily engaged in advancing the purposes of its member


organizations through fundraising, public awareness, or other


efforts for the benefit of its member organizations, and if the

Req. No. 3482 Page 27


member organization is primarily engaged either in providing


educational services and programs concerning health-related diseases


and conditions to individuals suffering from such health-related


diseases and conditions or their caregivers and family members or


support to such individuals, or in health-related research as to


such diseases and conditions, or both. In order to qualify for the


exemption authorized by this paragraph, the member nonprofit


organization shall be required to provide proof to the Oklahoma Tax


Commission of its membership status in the membership organization;


62. Sales of tangible personal property or services to or by an


organization which is part of a national volunteer women’s service


organization dedicated to promoting patriotism, preserving American


history, and securing better education for children and which has at


least one hundred sixty-eight thousand members in three thousand


chapters across the United States;


63. Sales of tangible personal property or services to or by a


YWCA or YMCA organization which is part of a national nonprofit


community service organization working to meet the health and social


service needs of its members across the United States;


64. Sales of tangible personal property or services to or by a


veteran’s organization which is exempt from taxation pursuant to the


provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26


U.S.C., Section 501(c)(19) and which is known as the Veterans of


Foreign Wars of the United States, Oklahoma Chapters chapters;

Req. No. 3482 Page 28


65. Sales of boxes of food by a church or by an organization,


which is exempt from taxation pursuant to the provisions of the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section


501(c)(3). To qualify under the provisions of this paragraph, the


organization must be organized for the primary purpose of feeding


needy individuals or to encourage volunteer service by requiring


such service in order to purchase food. These boxes shall only


contain edible staple food items;


66. Sales of tangible personal property or services to any


person with whom a church has duly entered into a construction


contract, necessary for carrying out such contract or to any


subcontractor to such a construction contract;


67. Sales of tangible personal property or services used


exclusively for charitable or educational purposes, to or by an


organization which:


a. is exempt from taxation pursuant to the provisions of


the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26


U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3),


b. has filed a Not-for-Profit Certificate of


Incorporation not-for-profit certificate of


incorporation in this state, and


c. is organized for the purpose of:


(1) providing training and education to


developmentally disabled individuals,

Req. No. 3482 Page 29


(2) educating the community about the rights,


abilities, and strengths of developmentally


disabled individuals, and


(3) promoting unity among developmentally disabled


individuals in their community and geographic


area;


68. Sales of tangible personal property or services to any


organization which is a shelter for abused, neglected, or abandoned


children and which is exempt from taxation pursuant to the


provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26


U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3); provided, until July 1, 2008, such


exemption shall apply only to eligible shelters for children from


birth to age twelve (12) and after July 1, 2008, such exemption


shall apply to eligible shelters for children from birth to age


eighteen (18);


69. Sales of tangible personal property or services to a child


care center which is licensed pursuant to the Oklahoma Child Care


Facilities Licensing Act and which:


a. possesses a 3-star rating from the Department of Human


Services Reaching for the Stars Program Quality Rating


and Improvement System or a national accreditation,


and


b. allows on-site universal prekindergarten education to


be provided to four-year-old children through a

Req. No. 3482 Page 30


contractual agreement with any public school or school


district.


For the purposes of this paragraph, sales made to any person,


firm, agency, or entity that has entered previously into a


contractual relationship with a child care center for construction


and improvement of buildings and other structures owned by the child


care center and operated for educational purposes shall be


considered sales made to a child care center. Any such person,


firm, agency, or entity making purchases on behalf of a child care


center shall certify, in writing, on the copy of the invoice or


sales ticket the nature of the purchase. Any such person, or person


acting on behalf of a firm, agency, or entity making purchases on


behalf of a child care center in violation of this paragraph shall


be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be


fined an amount equal to double the amount of sales tax involved or


incarcerated for not more than sixty (60) days or both;


70. a. Sales of tangible personal property to a service


organization of mothers who have children who are


serving or who have served in the military, which


service organization is exempt from taxation pursuant


to the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(19) and


which is known as the Blue Star Mothers of America,


Inc. The exemption provided by this paragraph shall

Req. No. 3482 Page 31


only apply to the purchase of tangible personal


property actually sent to United States military


personnel overseas who are serving in a combat zone


and not to any other tangible personal property


purchased by the organization. Provided, this


exemption shall not apply to any sales tax levied by a


city, town, county, or any other jurisdiction in this


state.


b. The exemption authorized by this paragraph shall be


administered in the form of a refund from the sales


tax revenues apportioned pursuant to Section 1353 of


this title, and the vendor shall be required to


collect the sales tax otherwise applicable to the


transaction. The purchaser may apply for a refund of


the state sales tax paid in the manner prescribed by


this paragraph. Within sixty (60) days after the end


of each calendar quarter, any purchaser that is


entitled to make application for a refund based upon


the exempt treatment authorized by this paragraph may


file an application for refund of the state sales


taxes paid during such preceding calendar quarter.


The Tax Commission shall prescribe a form for purposes


of making the application for refund.



Req. No. 3482 Page 32


c. A purchaser who applies for a refund pursuant to this


paragraph shall certify that the items were actually


sent to military personnel overseas in a combat zone.


Any purchaser that applies for a refund for the


purchase of items that are not authorized for


exemption under this paragraph shall be subject to a


penalty in the amount of Five Hundred Dollars


($500.00);


71. Sales of food and snack items to or by an organization


which is exempt from taxation pursuant to the provisions of the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section


501(c)(3), whose primary and principal purpose is providing funding


for scholarships in the medical field;


72. Sales of tangible personal property or services for use


solely on construction projects for organizations which are exempt


from taxation pursuant to the provisions of the Internal Revenue


Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3) and whose


purpose is providing end-of-life care and access to hospice services


to low-income individuals who live in a facility owned by the


organization. The exemption provided by this paragraph applies to


sales to the organization as well as to sales to any person with


whom the organization has duly entered into a construction contract,


necessary for carrying out such contract or to any subcontractor to


such a construction contract. Any person making purchases on behalf

Req. No. 3482 Page 33


of such organization shall certify, in writing, on the copy of the


invoice or sales ticket to be retained by the vendor that the


purchases are made for and on behalf of such organization and set


out the name of such organization. Any person who wrongfully or


erroneously certifies that purchases are for any of the above-named


organizations or who otherwise violates this section shall be guilty


of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined an


amount equal to double the amount of sales tax involved or


incarcerated for not more than sixty (60) days or both;


73. Sales of tickets for admission to events held by


organizations exempt from taxation pursuant to the provisions of the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section


501(c)(3) that are organized for the purpose of supporting general


hospitals licensed by the State Department of Health;


74. Sales of tangible personal property or services:


a. to a foundation which is exempt from taxation pursuant


to the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3) and


which raises tax-deductible contributions in support


of a wide range of firearms-related public interest


activities of the National Rifle Association of


America and other organizations that defend and foster


Second Amendment rights, and



Req. No. 3482 Page 34


b. to or by a grassroots fundraising program for sales


related to events to raise funds for a foundation


meeting the qualifications of subparagraph a of this


paragraph;


75. Sales by an organization or entity which is exempt from


taxation pursuant to the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3) which are related to


a fundraising event sponsored by the organization or entity when the


event does not exceed any five (5) consecutive days and when the


sales are not in the organization’s or the entity’s regular course


of business. Provided, the exemption provided in this paragraph


shall be limited to tickets sold for admittance to the fundraising


event and items which were donated to the organization or entity for


sale at the event;


76. Effective November 1, 2017, sales of tangible personal


property or services to an organization which is exempt from


taxation pursuant to the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3) and operates as a


collaborative model which connects community agencies in one


location to serve individuals and families affected by violence and


where victims have access to services and advocacy at no cost to the


victim;


77. Effective July 1, 2018, sales of tangible personal property


or services to or by an association which is exempt from taxation

Req. No. 3482 Page 35


pursuant to the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as


amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(19) and which is known as the


National Guard Association of Oklahoma;


78. Effective July 1, 2018, sales of tangible personal property


or services to or by an association which is exempt from taxation


pursuant to the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as


amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(4) and which is known as the


Marine Corps League Department of Oklahoma;


79. Sales of tangible personal property or services to the


American Legion, whether the purchase is made by the entity


chartered by the United States Congress or is an entity organized


under the laws of this or another state pursuant to the authority of


the national American Legion organization;


80. Sales of tangible personal property or services to or by an


organization which is:


a. exempt from taxation pursuant to the provisions of the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C.,


Section 501(c)(3),


b. verified with a letter from the MIT Fab Foundation as


an official member of the Fab Lab Network in


compliance with the Fab Charter, and


c. able to provide documentation that its primary and


principal purpose is to provide community access to


advanced 21st century manufacturing and digital

Req. No. 3482 Page 36


fabrication tools for science, technology,


engineering, art and math (STEAM) learning skills,


developing inventions, creating and sustaining


businesses, and producing personalized products;


81. Effective November 1, 2021, sales of tangible personal


property or services used solely for construction and remodeling


projects to an organization which is exempt from taxation pursuant


to the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,


U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3), and which meets the following


requirements:


a. its primary purpose is to construct or remodel and


sell affordable housing and provide homeownership


education to residents of Oklahoma that have an income


that is below one hundred percent (100%) of the Family


Median Family Income guidelines as defined by the U.S.


Department of Housing and Urban Development,


b. it conducts its activities in a manner that serves


public or charitable purposes, rather than commercial


purposes,


c. it receives funding and revenue and charges fees in a


manner that does not incentivize it or its employees


to act other than in the best interests of its


clients, and



Req. No. 3482 Page 37


d. it compensates its employees in a manner that does not


incentivize employees to act other than in the best


interests of its clients;


82. Effective November 1, 2021, sales of tangible personal


property or services to a nonprofit entity, organized pursuant to


Oklahoma law before January 1, 2022, exempt from federal income


taxation pursuant to Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended, the principal functions of which are to provide


assistance to natural persons following a disaster, with program


emphasis on repair or restoration to single-family residential


dwellings or the construction of a replacement single-family


residential dwelling. As used in this paragraph, “disaster” means


damage to property with or without accompanying injury to persons


from heavy rain, high winds, tornadic winds, drought, wildfire,


snow, ice, geologic disturbances, explosions, chemical accidents or


spills, and other events causing damage to property on a large


scale. For purposes of this paragraph, an entity that expended at


least seventy-five percent (75%) of its funds on the restoration to


single-family housing following a disaster including related general


and administrative expenses, shall be eligible for the exemption


authorized by this paragraph;


83. Effective November 1, 2021, through December 31, 2024,


sales of tangible personal property or services to a museum that:



Req. No. 3482 Page 38


a. operates as a part of an organization which is exempt


from taxation pursuant to the provisions of the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C.,


Section 501(c)(3),


b. is not accredited by the American Alliance of Museums,


and


c. operates on an annual budget of less than One Million


Dollars ($1,000,000.00);


84. Until July 1, 2022, sales of tangible personal property or


services for use in a clinical practice or medical facility operated


by an organization which is exempt from taxation pursuant to the


provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, of the


United States, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3), and which has entered


into a joint operating agreement with the University Hospitals Trust


created pursuant to Section 3224 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma


Statutes. The exemption provided by this paragraph shall be limited


to the purchase of tangible personal property and services for use


in clinical practices or medical facilities acquired or leased by


the organization from the University Hospitals Authority, University


Hospitals Trust, or the University of Oklahoma on or after June 1,


2021;


85. Sales of tangible personal property or services to or by a


women’s veterans organization, and its subchapters in this state,


that is exempt from taxation pursuant to the provisions of the

Req. No. 3482 Page 39


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section


501(c)(19) and is known as the Oklahoma Women Veterans Organization;


86. Sales of tangible personal property or services to a


nonprofit entity, organized pursuant to Oklahoma law before January


1, 2019, exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to Section


501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, the


principal functions of which are to provide assistance to natural


persons following a disaster, with program emphasis on repair or


restoration to single-family residential dwellings or the


construction of a replacement single-family residential dwelling.


For purposes of this paragraph, an entity operated exclusively for


charitable and educational purposes through the coordination of


volunteers for the disaster recovery of homes (as derived from Part


III, Statement of Program Services Service Accomplishments, of


Internal Revenue Service Form 990) and which offers its services


free of charge to disaster survivors statewide who are low income


with no or limited means of recovery on their own for the


restoration to single-family housing following a disaster including


related general and administrative expenses, shall be eligible for


the exemption authorized by this paragraph. The exemption provided


by this paragraph shall only be applicable to sales made on or after


July 1, 2022. As used in this paragraph, “disaster” means damage to


property with or without accompanying injury to persons from heavy


rain, high winds, tornadic winds, drought, wildfire, snow, ice,

Req. No. 3482 Page 40


geologic disturbances, explosions, chemical accidents or spills and


other events causing damage to property on a large scale;


87. Effective July 1, 2022, sales of tangible personal property


or services to an organization which is exempt from taxation


pursuant to the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as


amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3) and which provides support to


veterans, active duty members of the Armed Forces, reservists, and


members of the National Guard to assist with the transition to


civilian life and which provides documentation to the Oklahoma Tax


Commission that over seventy percent (70%) of its revenue is


expended on support for transition to civilian life; and


88. Sales of tangible personal property or services to or by an


organization in this state which:


a. is exempt from taxation pursuant to the provisions of


the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26


U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3), and


b. provides documentation to the Oklahoma Tax Commission


showing the organization’s principal purpose is to


provide school supplies or articles of clothing for


underserved students attending grades prekindergarten


through twelve at public schools in this state; and


89. Sales of tangible personal property or services to or by


organizations exempt from taxation pursuant to the provisions of the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section

Req. No. 3482 Page 41


501(c)(3) and the principal purpose of which is providing support to


municipal law enforcement departments, municipal fire departments,


emergency medical service providers operated by municipalities,


municipal disaster mitigation services, and first responder canine


training facilities.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3482 QD 12/30/2025 11:05:17 PM

































Req. No. 3482 Page 42